Louisiana, session 2026, HB657.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 182 in the city of Jeanerette, between
Hubertville Road and Canal Street, shall be known and is hereby designated as the "Berwick
'BJ' LeJeune, Jr. Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The portion of Louisiana Highway 182 in the city of New Iberia from
South Evangeline Street to Louisiana Highway 3212, shall be known and is hereby
designated as the Ret. Judge Richard 'Dickey' Haik, Sr. Highway".
Section 3. The portion of Louisiana Highway 182 in New Iberia from Louisiana
Highway 3212 to the city limit of Lafayette, shall be known and is hereby designated as the
"Col. Terry C. Landry, Sr. Highway".
Section 4. The portion of Louisiana Highway 96 in St. Martinville, extending from
the Saint Martin Parish Sheriff Regional Training Academy to Freedom Lane, shall be
known and is hereby designated as the "Phillip 'Poppa' Dauterive III Memorial Highway".
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 657 ENROLLED
Section 5. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting these designations
provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's
actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to
exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.